Maine, session 132, LD309.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §321, sub-§2, ¶E, as enacted by PL 1985, c. 161, §6, is
amended to read:
E. Elect a district committee for each congressional district; and
Sec. 2. 21-A MRSA §321, sub-§2, ¶F, as amended by PL 2005, c. 387, §4, is
further amended to read:
F. Elect a county committee for each county from persons nominated at municipal
caucuses held in the county, unless party rules provide for county committee members
to be elected directly by their respective municipalities. If a municipality entitled to
nominate a person for election to the county committee fails to do so, the convention
may elect any resident of that municipality to the county committee.; and
Sec. 3. 21-A MRSA §321, sub-§2, ¶G is enacted to read:
G. Determine the method by which the party's primary election to be held for the
general election following the next general election after the party's convention will be
determined. The party's final determination must be incorporated into party rules.
Sec. 4. 21-A MRSA §339, as enacted by PL 1985, c. 161, §6, is amended to read:
§339. Time and nature of election
The primary election shall must be held on the 2nd Tuesday of June of each general
election year and is considered to be a separate election for each party which that takes part
in it. This includes the duties of public officials in announcing the election, providing forms
and ballots, keeping records and any other matter necessary to effect the purpose of a
primary election. A primary election shall must be conducted the same as the general
election, as nearly as practicable, for each party unless, no later than October 1st of the year
prior to a party's primary election, the party's state committee notifies the Secretary of State
of an alternate method of conducting that party's primary election as determined by that
party under section 321. Upon receiving notification of an alternate method of conducting
a party's primary election, the Secretary of State shall announce the method by which that
party's primary election must be conducted.
Sec. 5. 21-A MRSA §723-A, sub-§5-D is enacted to read:
5-D. Opt-out for party primaries. A political party may opt out from the provisions
of this section for the party's primary election if the party's convention under section 321
votes to opt out of applying a ranked-choice voting count and instead determines an
alternate method for the party's primary election to be held for the general election
following the next general election after the party's convention to be determined and that
determination is incorporated into the party's rules.